src/scripts/Georgian/numbers.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;
define PositiveNumber NZDigit Digit^<12;

define From1to9 1:ერთი|2:ორი|3:სამი|4:ოთხი|5:ხუთი|6:ექვსი|7:შვიდი|8:რვა|9:ცხრა;
define Teen %0:ათი|1:თერთმეტი|2:თორმეტი|3:ცამეტი|4:თოთხმეტი|5:თხუთმეტი|6:თექვსმეტი|7:ჩვიდმეტი|8:თვრამეტი|9:ცხრამეტი;
define From10to19 1:0 Teen;

define From20to99 
[{20}:ოცი] | 
[{40}:ორმოცი] | 
[{60}:სამოცი] | 
[{80}:ოთხმოცი] | 
[[2:ოც|4:ორმოც|6:სამოც|8:ოთხმოც] 0:და From1to9] | 
[[3:ოც|5:ორმოც|7:სამოც|9:ოთხმოც] 0:და Teen] ; 

define From10to99 From10to19 | From20to99;

define Hundred 1:ასი|2:ორასი|3:სამასი|4:ოთხასი|5:ხუთასი|6:ექვსასი|7:შვიდასი|8:რვაასი|9:ცხრაასი;
define HundredStem 1:ას|2:ორას|3:სამას|4:ოთხას|5:ხუთას|6:ექვსას|7:შვიდას|8:რვაას|9:ცხრაას;

define From100to999 
[Hundred [{00}:0]] | 
[HundredStem [[[%0:0] From1to9] | From10to99]];

define From1to999 
From1to9 | From10to99 | From100to999;

define InsertThousand 
[..] -> ths || Digit _ Digit^3 .#. ; 

define InsertMillion 
[..] -> mln || Digit _ Digit^3 ths ; 

define InsertBillion 
[..] -> bln || Digit _ Digit^3 mln ; 

define GroupName ths|mln|bln;

define RemoveZeros 
%0+ (GroupName) @-> 0 || GroupName _ ;

define TranslateDigits 
From1to999 @-> ; 

define TranslateGroupNames 
ths:ათასი|mln:მილიონი|bln:მილიარდი @-> || _ .#. ,, 
ths:ათას|mln:მილიონ|bln:მილიარდ @-> || _ \.#.;

define RemoveOne 
1 -> 0 || .#.|GroupName _ ths ; 

regex 
[%0:ნული] | 
[PositiveNumber .o. InsertThousand .o. InsertMillion .o. InsertBillion .o. RemoveZeros .o. RemoveOne .o. TranslateDigits .o. TranslateGroupNames] ; 
